Louisiana, session 2026, SB281.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.71(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§9038.71. Baker Economic Development District and Convention Center
* * *
B. Boundaries. The district shall be comprised of all nonresidential parcels
of land bordering Plank Road within the city limit boundaries of the City city of
Baker, excluding parcels of land used in whole or in part for residential
purposes; beginning at the northern city limits on Plank Road identified by the
bridge as land parcel to the west approximately 250 yards past Lake Mary Drive
directly adjacent to parcel 3624560: Tract Y-1 CONT 7.41 ACRES, MORE OR
LESS, PARTITION OF THE DR ERIC W DAY ESTATE, BEING LOTS 4-B-1, 3-
A, 2-A, & A-1, OF THE T C PAULSEN & JJ MUNDINGER SUB & A 29.46
ACRE TRACT, ALL LYING IN SEC 29, T55 R1E RESUB 2004 and from said
point of beginning, the district shall extend southerly along both sides of Plank
Road, encompassing all nonresidential parcels which directly abut Plank Road,
continuing through the southern corporate limits of the city of Baker, crossing
Thomas Road, and extending further south into the unincorporated area of East
Baton Rouge Parish at Clark Street a point determined as the parcel fronting
Plank Road contiguous to the corridor and the following described parcels or
tracts of land located in Baker, referred to in this Section as the "property":
PARCEL 1:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 281 ENROLLED
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #44, Lot D-5.
Subdiv: BROWN TRACT. 6.89 ACRES, BEING TRACT D-5 OF THE BROWN
TRACT, ORIGINALLY THE WHITESELL PROPERTY IN SEC. 53, T5S, RIE,
(LESS TO STATE OF LA. DEPT. HWY;
PARCEL 2:
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #53..24.63
ACRES CONSISTING OF TRACTS "D-6" AND "D-7" AND THE UNDISPOSED
PORTION OF THE WILLIAM L. WHITESELL 43 ACRE TRACT IN SEC. 53,
T5S, R1E;
PARCEL 3:
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #49, Lot: X,
Subdiv: IOWA-LA. LAND CO.. LOT "X" CONT. 1.377 ACRES RESUB. OF THE
NORTH 28.20 ACRE & 15.00 ACRE TRACT IN SEC. 53, T5S, R1E OF THE
IOWA LAND CO., BEING PART OF THE BROWN TRACT. 1976. (P-32,091).
1984. (P-43,538);
PARCEL 4:
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #54..LOT 2-C,
CONT 4.299 ACRES RESUB. OF LOT 2 IN SEC. 53, T5S, R1E. 1999. (885-
11056). RESUB. 1999. IMPS. 2800-6300.;
PARCEL 5:
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #45, Lot:12,
Subdiv: BETHANY BAPTIST CHURCH. PROPERTY LOT 12, CONT. 7.461
ACRES RESUB. OF LOTS Y, D-2 & TRACT D-1-1 OF THE OLD BROWN
TRACT, BEING BETHANY BAPTIST CHURCH PROPERTY IN SEC. 53, T5S,
R1E. 1986. (647-648-9888). RESUB. 2001-05.;
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 281 ENROLLED
PARCEL 6:
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #46, Lot 13,
Subdiv: BETHANY BAPTIST CHURCH. PROPERTY LOT 13, CONT. 1.367
ACRES RESUB. OF LOTS Y, D-2 & TRACT D-1-1 OF THE OLD BROWN
TRACT, BEING BETHANY BAPTIST CHURCH PROPERTY IN SEC. 53, T5S,
R1E. 1986. (647-648-9888). RESUB. 2001-05.;
PARCEL 7:
A certain lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and improvements
thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baker known as Ward: 2-2 #47, Lot 8-A,
Subdiv: BETHANY BAPTIST CHURCH. PROPERTY LOT 8-A, CONT. 33.311
ACRES RESUB. OF LOT 8, BETHANY BAPTIST CHURCH PROPERTY & LOT
10, MILLARD T. OLIVER PROPERTY, IN SEC. 53, T5S, R1E. 1986. (647-648-
9888). 2005. (745-11739). RESUB. 2001-05.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.